lexd_components/hyw-numbers.lexd
եօթանասուներորդ:եօթանասուներորդ
եօթանասունմէկերորդ:եօթանասունմէկերորդ
եօթանասուներկրորդ:եօթանասուներկրորդ
եօթանասուներրորդ:եօթանասուներրորդ
եօթանասունչորրորդ:եօթանասունչորրորդ
եօթանասուներկուերորդ:եօթանասուներկուերորդ
եօթանասուներեքերորդ:եօթանասուներեքերորդ
եօթանասունչորսերորդ:եօթանասունչորսերորդ
եօթանասունհինգերորդ:եօթանասունհինգերորդ
եօթանասունվեցերորդ:եօթանասունվեցերորդ
եօթանասունեօթերորդ:եօթանասունեօթերորդ
եօթանասունութերորդ:եօթանասունութերորդ
եօթանասունիներորդ:եօթանասունիներորդ
եօթանասունիններորդ:եօթանասունիններորդ #with nasal

#schwa
եօթանասունըմէկերորդ:եօթանասունըմէկերորդ
եօթանասունըերկրորդ:եօթանասունըերկրորդ
եօթանասունըերրորդ:եօթանասունըերրորդ
եօթանասունըչորրորդ:եօթանասունըչորրորդ
եօթանասունըերկուերորդ:եօթանասունըերկուերորդ
եօթանասունըերեքերորդ:եօթանասունըերեքերորդ
եօթանասունըչորսերորդ:եօթանասունըչորսերորդ
եօթանասունըհինգերորդ:եօթանասունըհինգերորդ
եօթանասունըվեցերորդ:եօթանասունըվեցերորդ
եօթանասունըեօթերորդ:եօթանասունըեօթերորդ
եօթանասունըութերորդ:եօթանասունըութերորդ
եօթանասունըիներորդ:եօթանասունըիներորդ
եօթանասունըիններորդ:եօթանասունըիններորդ #with nasal

ութսուներորդ:ութսուներորդ
ութսունմէկերորդ:ութսունմէկերորդ
ութսուներկրորդ:ութսուներկրորդ
ութսուներրորդ:ութսուներրորդ
ութսունչորրորդ:ութսունչորրորդ
ութսուներկուերորդ:ութսուներկուերորդ
ութսուներեքերորդ:ութսուներեքերորդ
ութսունչորսերորդ:ութսունչորսերորդ
ութսունհինգերորդ:ութսունհինգերորդ
ութսունվեցերորդ:ութսունվեցերորդ
ութսունեօթերորդ:ութսունեօթերորդ
ութսունութերորդ:ութսունութերորդ
ութսունիներորդ:ութսունիներորդ
ութսունիններորդ:ութսունիններորդ #with nasal

#schwa
ութսունըմէկերորդ:ութսունըմէկերորդ
ութսունըերկրորդ:ութսունըերկրորդ
ութսունըերրորդ:ութսունըերրորդ
ութսունըչորրորդ:ութսունըչորրորդ
ութսունըերկուերորդ:ութսունըերկուերորդ
ութսունըերեքերորդ:ութսունըերեքերորդ
ութսունըչորսերորդ:ութսունըչորսերորդ
ութսունըհինգերորդ:ութսունըհինգերորդ
ութսունըվեցերորդ:ութսունըվեցերորդ
ութսունըեօթերորդ:ութսունըեօթերորդ
ութսունըութերորդ:ութսունըութերորդ
ութսունըիներորդ:ութսունըիներորդ
ութսունըիններորդ:ութսունըիններորդ #with nasal

ինիսուներորդ:ինիսուներորդ
ինիսունմէկերորդ:ինիսունմէկերորդ
ինիսուներկրորդ:ինիսուներկրորդ
ինիսուներրորդ:ինիսուներրորդ
ինիսունչորրորդ:ինիսունչորրորդ
ինիսուներկուերորդ:ինիսուներկուերորդ
ինիսուներեքերորդ:ինիսուներեքերորդ
ինիսունչորսերորդ:ինիսունչորսերորդ
ինիսունհինգերորդ:ինիսունհինգերորդ
ինիսունվեցերորդ:ինիսունվեցերորդ
ինիսունեօթերորդ:ինիսունեօթերորդ
ինիսունութերորդ:ինիսունութերորդ
ինիսունիներորդ:ինիսունիներորդ
ինիսունիններորդ:ինիսունիններորդ #with nasal

#schwa
ինիսունըմէկերորդ:ինիսունըմէկերորդ
ինիսունըերկրորդ:ինիսունըերկրորդ
ինիսունըերրորդ:ինիսունըերրորդ
ինիսունըչորրորդ:ինիսունըչորրորդ
ինիսունըերկուերորդ:ինիսունըերկուերորդ
ինիսունըերեքերորդ:ինիսունըերեքերորդ
ինիսունըչորսերորդ:ինիսունըչորսերորդ
ինիսունըհինգերորդ:ինիսունըհինգերորդ
ինիսունըվեցերորդ:ինիսունըվեցերորդ
ինիսունըեօթերորդ:ինիսունըեօթերորդ
ինիսունըութերորդ:ինիսունըութերորդ
ինիսունըիներորդ:ինիսունըիներորդ
ինիսունըիններորդ:ինիսունըիններորդ #with nasal

#with nasal
իննսուներորդ:իննսուներորդ
իննսունմէկերորդ:իննսունմէկերորդ
իննսուներկրորդ:իննսուներկրորդ
իննսուներրորդ:իննսուներրորդ
իննսունչորրորդ:իննսունչորրորդ
իննսուներկուերորդ:իննսուներկուերորդ
իննսուներեքերորդ:իննսուներեքերորդ
իննսունչորսերորդ:իննսունչորսերորդ
իննսունհինգերորդ:իննսունհինգերորդ
իննսունվեցերորդ:իննսունվեցերորդ
իննսունեօթերորդ:իննսունեօթերորդ
իննսունութերորդ:իննսունութերորդ
իննսունիներորդ:իննսունիներորդ
իննսունիններորդ:իննսունիններորդ #with nasal


հարիւրերորդ:հարիւրերորդ
հազարերորդ:հազարերորդ
միլիոներորդ:միլիոներորդ
պիլիոներորդ:պիլիոներորդ
միլիարդերորդ:միլիարդերորդ



PATTERN DigitNumbers
Digit+ [<num>:]
Digit+ ([.]|[,]) Digit+ [<num>:]

LEXICON Digit
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
